Utah statutes.
57-21-5.   Discriminatory practices enumerated -- Protected persons, classes
enumerated.
(1)  It is a discriminatory housing practice to do any of the following
because of a person's race, color, religion, sex, national origin, familial
status, source of income, or disability:
(a)  refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer, refuse to
negotiate for the sale or rental, or otherwise deny or make unavailable any
dwelling from any person;
(b)  discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges
of the sale or rental of any dwelling or in providing facilities or services
in connection with the dwelling; or
(c)  represent to any person that  any dwelling is not available for
inspection, sale, or rental when in fact the dwelling is available.
(2)  It is a discriminatory housing practice to make a representation orally
or in writing or make, print, circulate, publish, post, or cause to be made,
printed, circulated, published, or posted any notice, statement, or
advertisement, or to use any application form for the sale or rental of a
dwelling, that directly or indirectly expresses any preference, limitation, or
discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, national origin, familial
status, source of income, or disability, or expresses any intent to make any
such preference, limitation, or discrimination.
(3)  It is a discriminatory housing practice to induce or attempt to induce,
for profit, any person to buy, sell, or rent any  dwelling by making
representations about the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood of
persons of a particular race, color, religion, sex, national origin, familial
status, source of income, or disability.
(4)  A discriminatory housing practice includes:
(a)  a refusal to permit, at the expense of the disabled person, reasonable
modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by the person if
the modifications are necessary to afford that person full enjoyment of the
premises, except that in the case of a rental, the landlord, where it is
reasonable to do so, may condition permission for a modification on the renter
agreeing to restore the interior of the premises, when reasonable, to the
condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear
excepted;
(b)  a refusal to make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies,
practices, or services when the accommodations may be necessary to afford the
person equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; and
(c)  in connection with the design and construction of covered multifamily
dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991, a failure to design and
construct those dwellings in a manner that:
(i)  the dwellings have at least one building entrance on an accessible route,
unless it is impracticable to have one because of the terrain or unusual
characteristics of the site; and
(ii)  with respect to dwellings with a building entrance on an accessible
route:
(A)  the public use and common use portions of the dwelling are readily
accessible to and usable by disabled persons;
(B)  all the doors designed to allow passage into and within the dwellings are
sufficiently wide to allow passage by disabled persons in wheelchairs; and
(C)  all premises within these dwellings contain the following features of
adaptive design:
(I)  an accessible route into and through the dwelling;
(II)  light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other environmental
controls in accessible locations;
(III)  reinforcements in the bathroom walls to allow later installation of
grab bars; and
(IV)  kitchens and bathrooms such that an individual in a wheelchair can
maneuver about and use the space.
(5)  This section also applies to discriminatory housing practices because of
race, color, religion, sex, national origin, familial status, source of
income, or disability based upon a person's association with another person.
